District of Columbia statutes.
38-2602.01

Transfer of state-level functions from the Board of Education.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the District of Columbia Board of Education that support state-level functions related to state education agency responsibilities and all powers, duties, and functions delegated to the District of Columbia Board of Education concerning the establishment, development, and institution of state-level functions related to state education agency responsibilities identified in § 38-2602 are transferred to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education.

(b)

The transfer described in subsection (a) of this section shall be in accordance with § 38-2606.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 3a
as added June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 302(d), 54 DCR 4102

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2605.01.

Editor's Notes

Applicability: Section 305 of Law 17-9 provided that this title shall apply upon Congressional enactment of Title IX and inclusion of its effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Congress enacted the provisions of Title IX in Pub. L. 110-33, approved June 1, 2007.